Washington statutes.
RCW 33.08.020

Who may form association.

Any individuals desiring to transact a business of an association may, by complying with this chapter, become a body corporate for that purpose.

[ 1982 c 3 s 13; 1945 c 235 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 3717-122. Prior: 1933 c 183 s 3; 1925 ex.s. c 144 s 1; 1913 c 110 s 1; 1903 c 116 s 1; 1890 p 56 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.